California, session 20252026, SB393.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 49590 of the Education Code is amended to read:49590. The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California strives to serve food of the highest quality and of greatest nutritional value possible. The department shall monitor schools participating in the federal National School Lunch Program or federal School Breakfast Program to ensure that the nutrition levels of meals served to schoolage children qualify those meals for reimbursement under the federal child nutrition program regulations as nutritionally adequate breakfasts and nutritionally adequate lunches, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 49531.